New York, session 2025-2026, S3351.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of schedule II of section 3306 of the 2 public health law is amended by adding a new paragraph 5 to read as 3 follows: 4 (5) Tianeptine sodium. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06977-01-5